Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-515
Chief Water Officer; jurisdiction; power; authority.

The Chief Water Officer is hereby vested with jurisdiction, power, and authority, when conditions stated in section 46-516 are found to exist, to establish reclamation districts for conserving, developing, and stabilizing supplies of water for domestic, irrigation, power, manufacturing, and other beneficial uses as herein provided.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 3, p. 526;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 152.

This and succeeding fourteen sections provide generally for the organization and establishment of reclamation districts as political corporate quasi-municipal subdivisions of the state. Nebraska Mid-State Reclamation District v. Hall County, 152 Neb. 410, 41 N.W.2d 397 (1950).